District of Columbia statutes.
11-2502

Censure, suspension, or disbarment for cause.

The District of Columbia Court of Appeals may censure, suspend from practice, or expel a member of its bar for crime, misdemeanor, fraud, deceit, malpractice, professional misconduct, or conduct prejudicial to the administration of justice. A fraudulent act or misrepresentation by an applicant in connection with this application or admission is sufficient cause for the revocation by the court of such person’s admission.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 521, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(112), 108 Stat. 713

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-2502.
1973 Ed., § 11-2502.